Missouri, session 2026, HB3526.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 137.1050, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 137.1050, to read as follows:
137.1050. 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Eligible credit amount", the difference between an eligible taxpayer's real
property tax liability on such taxpayer's homestead for a given tax year, minus the real
property tax liability on such homestead in the eligible taxpayer's initial credit year;
(2) "Eligible taxpayer", a Missouri resident who:
(a) Is [sixty-two] sixty-five years of age or older as of January first of the
applicable tax year;
(b) a. Has a combined household Missouri adjusted gross income less than or
equal to seventy-five thousand dollars; or
b. Is receiving public assistance benefits for Social Security retirement or
disability as determined under the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 301 et
seq., as amended, or public assistance benefits from the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs related to veteran status, retirement, or a service-related disability as a
result of service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States;
[(b)] (c) Is an owner of record of a homestead or has a legal or equitable interest in
such property as evidenced by a written instrument; and
[(c)] (d) Is liable for the payment of real property taxes on such homestead;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3526 2
(3) "Homestead", real property actually occupied by an eligible taxpayer as the
primary residence. An eligible taxpayer shall not claim more than one primary residence;
(4) "Initial credit year":
(a) In the case of a taxpayer that meets all requirements of subdivision (2) of this
subsection prior to the year in which a credit is authorized pursuant to subsection 2 of this
section, the year in which such credit is authorized;
(b) For all other taxpayers, the year in which the taxpayer meets all requirements of
subdivision (2) of this subsection.

If in any tax year subsequent to the eligible taxpayer's initial credit year the eligible taxpayer's
real property tax liability is lower than such liability in the initial credit year, such tax year
shall be considered the eligible taxpayer's initial credit year for all subsequent tax years. This
provision shall not apply if an eligible taxpayer's real property tax liability is lower than such
liability in the taxpayer's initial credit year solely due to a reduction in a property tax levy
made pursuant to section 321.554.
2. [(1)] Any county authorized to impose a property tax [may] shall grant a property
tax credit to eligible taxpayers residing in such county in an amount equal to the taxpayer's
eligible credit amount[, provided that:
(a) Such county adopts an ordinance authorizing such credit; or
(b) a. A petition in support of a referendum on such a credit is signed by at least five
percent of the registered voters of such county voting in the last gubernatorial election and the
petition is delivered to the governing body of the county, which shall subsequently hold a
referendum on such credit.
b. The ballot of submission for the question submitted to the voters pursuant to
paragraph (b) of this subdivision shall be in substantially the following form:]
[Shall the County of ______ exempt senior citizens aged 62 and
older from increases in the property tax liability due on such
senior citizens' primary residence?]
[ YES ] [ NO ]

[If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the credit shall be in effect.
(2) An ordinance adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall not preclude such ordinance from being amended or superseded by a petition
subsequently adopted pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection].
3. (1) A county granting credit pursuant to this section shall apply such credit when
calculating the eligible taxpayer's property tax liability for the tax year. The amount of the

HB 3526 3
credit shall be noted on the statement of tax due sent to the eligible taxpayer by the county
collector. The county governing body may adopt reasonable procedures in order to carry out
the purposes and intent of this section, provided that the county shall not adopt any procedure
that limits the definition or scope of eligible credit amount or eligible taxpayer as defined in
this section. A county shall create a simple one-page application, keep and maintain
records related to the eligible taxpayers and property tax credits granted under the
provisions of this section, and notify an eligible taxpayer annually of continued
participation and eligibility.
(2) If an eligible taxpayer makes new construction and improvements to such eligible
taxpayer's homestead, the real property tax liability for the taxpayer's initial credit year shall
be increased to reflect the real property tax liability attributable to such new construction and
improvements.
(3) If an eligible taxpayer's homestead is annexed into a taxing jurisdiction to which
such eligible taxpayer did not owe real property tax in the eligible taxpayer's initial credit
year, then the real property tax liability for the taxpayer's initial credit year shall be increased
to reflect the real property tax liability owed to the annexing taxing jurisdiction.
4. For the purposes of calculating property tax levies pursuant to section 137.073, the
total amount of credits authorized by a county pursuant to this section shall be considered tax
revenue, as such term is defined in section 137.073, actually received.
5. A county granting a tax credit pursuant to this section shall notify each political
subdivision within such county of the total credit amount applicable to such political
subdivision by no later than November thirtieth of each year.
6. Subject to appropriation, the state shall reimburse, on an annual basis, any
political subdivision of this state for any decrease in revenue due to the provisions of this
section in accordance with the provisions of Article X, Section 6(a) of the Constitution of
Missouri.
✔